District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1107.02

Use of surplus campaign funds.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 471, Pub. L. 93-376, title VII, § 703
Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title VIII, § 805, 23 DCR 2050
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1, § 3(f), 25 DCR 9454
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(o), (r), (s), 29 DCR 458
July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-138, § 2, 47 DCR 3424
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
1981 Ed., § 1-1472.
1973 Ed., § 1-1192.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).